Illinois, session 104th, HB5013.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-130 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/1-130)7    Sec. 1-130. Property; real property; real estate; land; 8tract; lot. 9    (a) The land itself, with all things contained therein, 10and also all buildings, structures and improvements, and other 11permanent fixtures thereon, including all oil, gas, coal, and 12other minerals in the land and the right to remove oil, gas and 13other minerals, excluding coal, from the land, and all rights 14and privileges belonging or pertaining thereto, except where 15otherwise specified by this Code. Not included therein are 16low-income housing tax credits authorized by Section 42 of the 17Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 42. Except as otherwise 18provided in this Section and the Mobile Home Local Services 19Tax Act, a building or structure, including a portable shed, 20garage, or other outbuilding, that is not affixed to or 21installed on a permanent foundation or connected to utilities 22for year-round occupancy is not considered real property. 23    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, mobile   HB5013- 2 -LRB104 15670 HLH 28842 b1homes and manufactured homes that (i) are located outside of 2mobile home parks and (ii) are taxed under the Mobile Home 3Local Services Tax Act on the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall continue to 5be taxed under the Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act and shall 6not be assessed and taxed as real property until the home is 7sold or transferred or until the home is relocated to a 8different parcel of land outside of a mobile home park. If a 9mobile home or manufactured home described in this subsection 10(b) is sold, transferred, or relocated to a different parcel 11of land outside of a mobile home park, then the home shall be 12assessed and taxed as real property whether or not that mobile 13home or manufactured home is affixed to a permanent 14foundation, as defined in Section 5-5 of the Conveyance and 15Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 16Severance Act, or installed on a permanent foundation, and 17whether or not such mobile home or manufactured home is real 18property as defined in Section 5-35 of the Conveyance and 19Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 20Severance Act. Mobile homes and manufactured homes that are 21located outside of mobile home parks and assessed and taxed as 22real property on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 23the 96th General Assembly shall continue to be assessed and 24taxed as real property whether or not those mobile homes or 25manufactured homes are affixed to a permanent foundation as 26defined in the Conveyance and Encumbrance of Manufactured   HB5013- 3 -LRB104 15670 HLH 28842 b1Homes as Real Property and Severance Act or installed on 2permanent foundations and whether or not those mobile homes or 3manufactured homes are real property as defined in the 4Conveyance and Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real 5Property and Severance Act. If a mobile or manufactured home 6that is located outside of a mobile home park is relocated to a 7mobile home park, it must be considered chattel and must be 8taxed according to the Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act. The 9owner of a mobile home or manufactured home that is located 10outside of a mobile home park may file a request with the chief 11county assessment officer that the home be taxed as real 12property. 13    (c) Mobile homes and manufactured homes that are located 14in mobile home parks must be taxed according to the Mobile Home 15Local Services Tax Act.16    (d) If the provisions of this Section conflict with the 17Illinois Manufactured Housing and Mobile Home Safety Act, the 18Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act, the Mobile Home Park Act, 19or any other provision of law with respect to the taxation of 20mobile homes or manufactured homes located outside of mobile 21home parks, the provisions of this Section shall control.22    (e) Spent fuel pools and dry cask storage systems in which 23nuclear fuel is stored and is pending further or final 24disposal from a nuclear power plant that was decommissioned 25before January 1, 2021 shall be considered real property and 26be assessable. The chief county assessment officer shall   HB5013- 4 -LRB104 15670 HLH 28842 b1assess such property based on a national evaluation of the 2effective value per pound of spent nuclear fuel, calculated by 3examining assessments or PILOT agreements and documented 4pounds of spent nuclear fuel, at nuclear power plants where 5such property is similarly considered real property. 6(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.